Nebraska, session 109, LB810.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB810 LB810
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-885.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-885.03 (1) Any person who, directly or indirectly for another,
with the intention or upon the promise of receiving any form of
compensation or consideration, offers, attempts, or agrees to perform or
performs any single act described in subdivision (2) of section
81-885.01, whether as a part of a transaction, or as an entire
transaction, shall be deemed a broker, associate broker, or salesperson
within the meaning of the Nebraska Real Estate License Act, and such
action shall constitute sufficient contact with the state for the
exercise of personal jurisdiction over such person in any action arising
out of such action. Committing a single act described in such subdivision
by a person required to be licensed under the Nebraska Real Estate
License Act and not so licensed shall constitute a violation of the act
for which the commission may impose sanctions pursuant to this section
for the protection of the public health, safety, or welfare.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary,
the director may issue a cease and desist order against any person who
violates this section by performing any action described in subsection
(1) of this section without the appropriate license. Such order shall be
final ten days after issuance unless the violator requests a hearing
before the commission pursuant to section 81-885.25.
(3) If such person violates a cease and desist order issued pursuant
to this section, he or she shall be subject to further proceedings before
the commission. If, during such proceedings, the commission makes a
finding of guilt, the commission may impose a fine not to exceed (a) one
thousand dollars for each day that any action is performed without the
appropriate license following the issuance of the order or (b) the amount
of all money earned as commission by the violator, whichever is greater.
Judgments for the collection of any fine imposed under this section may
be filed in the district court of any county in this state.
-2-

LB810 LB810
2026 2026
(4) Notice and hearing requirements under this section shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-885.07, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-885.07 (1)(a) There is hereby created the State Real Estate
Commission which shall consist of the Secretary of State, who shall be
chairperson of the commission, and six members appointed by the Governor.
(b) Three of the members of the commission appointed by the Governor
shall be active and licensed real estate brokers who have engaged in the
real estate business as brokers or associate brokers for not less than
five years, which members shall be appointed by the Governor, one from
each of the three congressional districts. If a boundary of a
congressional district changes, a member affected by such change shall
continue to serve the balance of the term of appointment for the district
for which such member was appointed.
(c) The remaining members shall be appointed at large, one of whom
shall be representative of the public, one of whom shall be a licensed
real estate salesperson who has engaged in the real estate business as a
salesperson for not less than three years, and one of whom shall be an
active and licensed real estate broker who has engaged in the real estate
business as a broker or associate broker for not less than five years.
(2) At the expiration of the term of any member of the commission,
the Governor shall appoint a successor for a term of six years. Any
appointed member shall be limited to one six-year term, in addition to
any partial term served. In the event of a vacancy on the commission, the
Governor shall fill such vacancy by appointing a member to serve during
the unexpired term of the member whose office has become vacant. In the
absence of the chairperson, the senior member of the commission in point
of service present shall serve as presiding officer. Not less than four
members of the commission must be present at any official meeting of the
commission. The action of the majority of the members of the commission
-3-

LB810 LB810
2026 2026
shall be deemed the action of the commission. No appointed person may act
as a member of the commission while holding any other elective or
appointive state or federal office.
(3) Each member of the commission shall receive as compensation for
each day actually spent on official duties at scheduled meetings the sum
of one hundred dollars and expenses incurred in the performance of
official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(4) The commission shall employ a director and deputy director who
shall keep a record of all the proceedings, transactions, communications,
and official acts of the commission, be custodians custodian of all the
records of the commission, and perform such other duties as the
commission may require. The director shall call a meeting of the
commission at the discretion of the director or upon the direction of the
chairperson or upon a written request of two or more members of the
commission. The commission may employ such other employees as may be
necessary to properly carry out the Nebraska Real Estate License Act, fix
the salaries of such employees, and make such other expenditures as are
necessary to properly carry out the act. The office of the commission
shall be maintained in Lincoln and all files, records, and property of
the commission shall remain in such office. Neither the director, deputy
director, nor any employee of the commission may be an officer or paid
employee of any real estate association or group of real estate dealers
or brokers.
(5) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
relating to the administration of but not inconsistent with the act.
(6) The commission may conduct or assist in conducting real estate
institutes and seminars and incur and pay the necessary expenses in
connection therewith, which institutes or seminars shall be open to all
licensees.
(7) The commission may charge reasonable fees for services it
renders, not to exceed the actual costs thereof, except as otherwise
-4-

LB810 LB810
2026 2026
provided in the act. The fees established by the commission pursuant to
the act shall be established at the level necessary to meet expenditures
of the commission as approved by the Legislature and to provide a
sufficient cash fund balance.
Sec. 3. Section 81-885.25, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-885.25 (1) Before the commission censures a licensee, imposes a
civil fine, or revokes or suspends a license, or issues a cease and
desist order, the commission shall send to the licensee or violator a
copy of the complaint by registered mail, certified mail, first-class
mail using intelligent mail barcode or another similar tracking method
used or approved by the United States Postal Service, or a designated
delivery service as provided in section 25-505.01, which contains the
charges against the licensee or violator and, unless the licensee or
violator waives the right to a hearing and has executed a consent order,
give the licensee or violator a hearing on the matter.
(2) The licensee or violator shall have full authority to be heard
in person or by counsel before the commission in reference to such
charges. The commission shall, at least twenty days prior to the date set
for hearing, notify the licensee or violator in writing of the date and
place of the hearing. Such notice may be served by delivering it
personally to the licensee or violator or by sending it by either
registered mail, certified mail, first-class mail using intelligent mail
barcode or another similar tracking method used or approved by the United
States Postal Service, or a designated delivery service as provided in
section 25-505.01, to the last-known business address of such licensee or
any known address of the violator. If the licensee is an associate broker
or a salesperson, the commission shall also notify the broker employing
the licensee by mailing a copy of such notice to the broker's last-known
business address.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-885.03, 81-885.07, and 81-885.25,
-5-

LB810 LB810
2026 2026
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-